Colorado, session 2026A, HB1246.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 3.7 to title
40 as follows:
ARTICLE 3.7
Consumer-Regulated Electric Utilities
40-3.7-101. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) RELIABLE, AFFORDABLE, AND SUFFICIENT ELECTRICITY SUPPLY
IS VITAL TO ECONOMIC GROWTH AND PUBLIC WELFARE;
(b) NEW INDUSTRIAL, COMMERCIAL, AND DATA CENTER
DEVELOPMENTS REQUIRE RAPID ACCESS TO ELECTRICITY SUPPLIES
WITHOUT SHIFTING COSTS OR RISKS TO EXISTING RATEPAYERS;
(c) CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITIES ARE PRIVATELY
GOVERNED ELECTRICITY PROVIDERS SERVING NEW, NONRESIDENTIAL
LOADS;
(d) IT IS THE POLICY OF THE STATE TO PERMIT THE CREATION OF
CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITIES, WHICH OPERATE
INDEPENDENTLY OF THE STATE-REGULATED PUBLIC UTILITY SYSTEM; AND
(e) CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITIES REMAIN SUBJECT
-2- HB26-1246

TO ENVIRONMENTAL, SAFETY, AND WORKPLACE LAWS AND REGULATIONS
THAT PROTECT THE PUBLIC INTEREST, WHILE OTHERWISE OPERATING
OUTSIDE OF PUBLIC UTILITY STATE REGULATION.
40-3.7-102. Consumer-regulated electric utilities - definition.
(1) AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 3.7, "CONSUMER-REGULATED
ELECTRIC UTILITY" MEANS AN ELECTRIC GENERATION AND SUPPLY SYSTEM
CONSTRUCTED ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS ARTICLE 3.7 FOR
THE SOLE PURPOSE OF SERVING NEW INDUSTRIAL, COMMERCIAL, DATA
CENTER, OR OTHER NONRESIDENTIAL LOADS NOT PREVIOUSLY SERVED BY
A PROVIDER OF RETAIL ELECTRIC SERVICE.
(2) A CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITY MAY OWN OR
OPERATE A FACILITY NECESSARY FOR ELECTRIC GENERATION, ENERGY
STORAGE, TRANSMISSION, DISTRIBUTION, OR THE SUPPLY OF ELECTRICITY.
A CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITY MAY SELL ELECTRICITY AT
RETAIL TO ELIGIBLE CUSTOMERS IF THE CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC
UTILITY IS FULLY CONTAINED WITHIN THE STATE AND IS PHYSICALLY
ISLANDED FROM THE ELECTRIC GRID AND FROM A PUBLIC UTILITY THAT IS
REGULATED BY THE COMMISSION.
40-3.7-103. Exemption from public utility regulation.
(1) A CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITY IS NOT A PUBLIC
UTILITY AND IS NOT SUBJECT TO REGULATION AS A PUBLIC UTILITY.
NOTHING IN THIS TITLE 40 APPLIES TO A CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC
UTILITY EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY STATED IN THIS ARTICLE 3.7. THE
COMMISSION HAS NO JURISDICTION TO REGULATE A
CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITY EXCEPT FOR THE AUTHORITY
EXPRESSLY GRANTED IN THIS ARTICLE 3.7.
(2) A CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITY IS SUBJECT TO
-3- HB26-1246

APPLICABLE FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL LAWS AND REGULATIONS,
INCLUDING:
(a) ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AND PERMITTING LAWS;
(b) BUILDING AND FIRE CODES;
(c) WORKPLACE HEALTH AND SAFETY STANDARDS; AND
(d) STORM-DEBRIS REMOVAL AND RIGHT-OF-WAY MAINTENANCE
REQUIREMENTS FOR A CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITY LOCATED
WITHIN A PUBLIC RIGHT-OF-WAY.
(3) A CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITY THAT ELECTS TO
INTERCONNECT WITH THE ELECTRIC GRID IN A SERVICE TERRITORY OF A
PUBLIC UTILITY THAT IS SUBJECT TO REGULATION BY THE COMMISSION:
(a) SHALL COMPLY WITH APPLICABLE INTERCONNECTION
REQUIREMENTS PURSUANT TO SECTION 40-2-124; AND
(b) WHEN INTERCONNECTED, CEASES TO BE A
CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITY AND BECOMES A PUBLIC
UTILITY SUBJECT TO REGULATION UNDER ARTICLES 1 TO 7 OF THIS TITLE
40.
40-3.7-104. Facilities located within public rights-of-way.
A CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITY MAY CONSTRUCT AND
OPERATE A FACILITY WITHIN AN EXISTING PUBLIC RIGHT-OF-WAY, SUBJECT
TO APPLICABLE PERMITTING, RESTORATION, AND PUBLIC SAFETY
REQUIREMENTS. A PUBLIC ENTITY THAT REVIEWS A
CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITY'S APPLICATION FOR USE OF A
PUBLIC RIGHT-OF-WAY SHALL FOCUS THE REVIEW ON PUBLIC SAFETY,
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, ADEQUACY OF RIGHT-OF-WAY
RESTORATION, AND STORM-RESPONSE PLANS.
40-3.7-105. Construction and severability.
-4- HB26-1246

(1) THIS ARTICLE 3.7 SHALL BE LIBERALLY CONSTRUED FOR THE
PURPOSE OF ENCOURAGING THE ESTABLISHMENT OF
CONSUMER-REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITIES TO SERVE NEW LOADS AND
PROMOTE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
(2) IF ANY PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE 3.7 IS HELD INVALID, SUCH
INVALIDITY SHALL NOT AFFECT OTHER PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 3.7,
WHICH CAN BE GIVEN EFFECT WITHOUT THE INVALID PROVISION.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-5- HB26-1246